Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 11. Boundaries

§ 1. State boundaries.

The boundaries of the State of Wyoming shall be as follows: Commencing at the intersection of the twenty-seventh meridian of longitude west from Washington with the forty-fifth degree of north latitude, and running thence west to the thirty-fourth meridian of west longitude, thence south to the forty-first degree of north latitude, thence east to the twenty-seventh meridian of west longitude, and thence north to the place of beginning.

Cross references. —

As to boundaries of counties, see §§

18-1-101

,

18-1-102

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).